North Carolina, session 2025, SB1040.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 131E-176 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-176. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(1b) Ambulatory surgical facility. – A facility designed for the provision of a
specialty ambulatory surgical program or a multispecialty ambulatory surgical
program. An ambulatory surgical facility serves patients who require local,
regional, or general anesthesia and a period of post-operative observation. An
ambulatory surgical facility may only admit patients for a period of less than
24 hours and shall provide at least one designated operating room or
gastrointestinal endoscopy room and at least one designated recovery room,
have available the necessary equipment and trained personnel to handle
emergencies, provide adequate quality assurance and assessment by an
evaluation and review committee, and maintain adequate medical records for
each patient. An ambulatory surgical facility may be operated as a part of a
physician's or dentist's office so long as the facility is licensed under Part 4 of
Article 6 of this Chapter, but the performance of incidental, limited
ambulatory surgical procedures that do not constitute an ambulatory surgical
program and that are performed in a physician's or dentist's office does not
make that office an ambulatory surgical facility.
(1c) Ambulatory surgical program. – A formal program for providing on a
same-day basis those surgical procedures that require local, regional, or
general anesthesia and a period of post-operative observation to patients
whose admission for more than 24 hours is determined, prior to surgery or
gastrointestinal endoscopy, to be medically unnecessary.
…
*S1040-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7d) Gastrointestinal endoscopy room. – A room in a licensed health service
facility used for the performance of procedures that require the insertion of a
flexible endoscope into a gastrointestinal orifice to visualize the
gastrointestinal lining and adjacent organs for diagnostic or therapeutic
purposes.
…
(9b) Health service facility. – A hospital; long-term care hospital; rehabilitation
facility; nursing home facility; adult care home; kidney disease treatment
center, including freestanding hemodialysis units; intermediate care facility
for individuals with intellectual disabilities; home health agency office;
diagnostic center; or hospice office, hospice inpatient facility, or hospice
residential care facility; or ambulatory surgical facility. This term does not
include a qualified urban ambulatory surgical facility.
(9c) Health service facility bed. – A bed licensed for use in a health service facility
in the categories of (i) acute care beds; (ii) rehabilitation beds; (iii) nursing
home beds; (iv) (iii) intermediate care beds for individuals with intellectual
disabilities; (v) (iv) hospice inpatient facility beds; (vi) (v) hospice residential
care facility beds; (vii) (vi) adult care home beds; and (viii) (vii) long-term
care hospital beds.
…
(13d) Hospital. – A public or private institution that is primarily engaged in
providing to inpatients, by or under supervision of physicians, diagnostic
services and therapeutic services for medical diagnosis, treatment, and care of
injured, disabled, or sick persons, or rehabilitation services for the
rehabilitation of injured, disabled, or sick persons. The term includes all
facilities licensed pursuant to G.S. 131E-77, except rehabilitation facilities
and long-term care hospitals.
…
(15a) Multispecialty ambulatory surgical program. – A formal program for
providing on a same-day basis surgical procedures for at least three of the
following specialty areas: gynecology, otolaryngology, plastic surgery,
general surgery, ophthalmology, orthopedic, or oral surgery.
…
(16) New institutional health services. – Any of the following:
…
b. Except with respect to qualified urban ambulatory surgical facilities
and except as otherwise provided in G.S. 131E-184(e), the obligation
by any person of a capital expenditure exceeding four million dollars
($4,000,000) to develop or expand a health service or a health service
facility, or which relates to the provision of a health service. The cost
of any studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings,
specifications, and other activities, including staff effort and
consulting and other services, essential to the acquisition,
improvement, expansion, or replacement of any plant or equipment
with respect to which an expenditure is made shall be included in
determining if the expenditure exceeds four million dollars
($4,000,000). Beginning September 30, 2022, and on September 30
each year thereafter, the amount in this sub-subdivision shall be
adjusted using the Medical Care Index component of the Consumer
Price Index published by the U.S. Department of Labor for the
12-month period preceding the previous September 1.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1040-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
r. The conversion of a specialty ambulatory surgical program to a
multispecialty ambulatory surgical program or the addition of a
specialty to a specialty ambulatory surgical program.
…
(17a) Nursing care. – Any of the following:
a. Skilled nursing care and related services for residents who require
medical or nursing care.
b. Rehabilitation services services, other than those provided at an
inpatient rehabilitation facility, for the rehabilitation of individuals
who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
c. Health-related care and services provided on a regular basis to
individuals who, because of their mental or physical condition, require
care and services above the level of room and board that can be made
available to them only through institutional facilities.
These are services that are not primarily for the care and treatment of
mental diseases.
…
(21a) Qualified urban ambulatory surgical facility. – An ambulatory surgical facility
that meets all of the following criteria:
a. Is licensed by the Department to operate as an ambulatory surgical
facility.
b. Has a single specialty or multispecialty ambulatory surgical program.
c. Is located in a county with a population greater than 125,000 according
to the 2020 federal decennial census or any subsequent federal
decennial census.
(22) Rehabilitation facility. – A public or private inpatient facility which is
operated for the primary purpose of assisting in the rehabilitation of
individuals with disabilities through an integrated program of medical and
other services which are provided under competent, professional
supervision.A facility that has been classified and designated as an inpatient
rehabilitation facility by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
pursuant to Part 412 of Subchapter B of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of
Federal Regulations.
…
(24f) Specialty ambulatory surgical program. – A formal program for providing on
a same-day basis surgical procedures of the same surgical specialty and
authorized by its certificate of need, if a certificate of need is required.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 131E-178(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) No person shall offer or develop a new institutional health service without first
obtaining a certificate of need from the Department; provided, however, no person who provides
gastrointestinal endoscopy procedures in one or more gastrointestinal endoscopy rooms located
in a nonlicensed setting, shall be required to obtain a certificate of need to license that setting as
an ambulatory surgical facility with the existing number of gastrointestinal endoscopy rooms,
provided that:Department.
(1) The license application is postmarked for delivery to the Division of Health
Service Regulation by December 31, 2006;
(2) The applicant verifies, by affidavit submitted to the Division of Health Service
Regulation within 60 days of the effective date of this act, that the facility is
in operation as of the effective date of this act or that the completed application
Senate Bill 1040-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for the building permit for the facility was submitted by the effective date of
this act;
(3) The facility has been accredited by The Accreditation Association for
Ambulatory Health Care, The Joint Commission on Accreditation of
Healthcare Organizations, or The American Association for Accreditation of
Ambulatory Surgical Facilities by the time the license application is
postmarked for delivery to the Division of Health Service Regulation of the
Department; and
(4) The license application includes a commitment and plan for serving indigent
and medically underserved populations.
All other persons proposing to obtain a license to establish an ambulatory surgical facility for
the provision of gastrointestinal endoscopy procedures shall be required to obtain a certificate of
need. The annual State Medical Facilities Plan shall not include policies or need determinations
that limit the number of gastrointestinal endoscopy rooms that may be approved."
SECTION 3. G.S. 90-21.82A(a)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) Ambulatory surgical facility. – As defined in G.S. 131E-176.G.S. 131E-146."
SECTION 4. G.S. 131E-146(3), 131E-147.5, 131E-176(5b), 131E-176(5c), and
131E-176(21) are repealed.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, the sum of fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. These funds shall be used
to do both of the following:
(1) To implement the repeal of certificate of need laws for ambulatory surgical
facilities and for inpatient rehabilitation services, facilities, and beds, as
provided by Sections 1 and 2 of this act.
(2) To develop a comprehensive plan for the phased elimination of the State's
remaining certificate of need laws. The plan shall include (i) a proposed
phaseout to be completed within a three-year period following adoption of the
plan by an act of the General Assembly and (ii) a recommended time line for
phasing out specific health services and health service facilities. The
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service
Regulation, shall develop and submit the plan required by this subdivision to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the
chairs of the House Appropriations Committee on Health and Human
Services, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and
Human Services, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Fiscal Research Division by July 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 4 Senate Bill 1040-Second Edition